Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Grain Handlers.

§ 3.2-4322.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Grain”
means corn (maize), wheat, rye, oats, barley, flaxseed, soybeans, and such other grains as the usages of the trade may warrant and permit.

“Handler”
means a person who buys grain for resale as grain or grain products.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.1; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4323.
Commissioner authorized to require registration; forms.

The Commissioner may require all handlers to register on forms prepared for that purpose. Such forms shall require the handler to state his name, address, and the county or city where he shall weigh and grade grain.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.2; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4324.
Regulations.

The Board may adopt regulations relating to the handling of grain in the Commonwealth, including:

The weighing devices, approved under the Virginia Weights and Measures Law (§

3.2-5600

et seq.) and the procedures employed to give accurate weights.

The grading equipment that is acceptable in administering the United States Grain Standards Act and the use of grading equipment to be used in determining the value of grain. Such use of such equipment shall be pursuant to procedures employed by inspectors licensed under the United States Grain Standards Act.

Samples of lots graded by other than a Virginia licensed inspector and the lot discounted shall be identity preserved for 24 hours.

The keeping of records in accordance with good business practices.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.3; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4325.
Grain handlers to register if required by Commissioner.

All persons before operating as a handler in the Commonwealth shall register with the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.4; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.4; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4326.
Grain to be purchased from registered handlers.

It is unlawful to buy grain for resale as grain or grain products unless bought by a handler registered by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.5; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.5; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4327.
Violation of article.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article or regulations established by the Board hereunder is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-269.6; 1966, c. 433, § 3.1-348.6; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.